Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF173.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1107HV (1) 91 th/ns H.F. 173 Section 1. Section 321.482A, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 Notwithstanding section 321.482 , a person who is convicted 3 of operating a motor vehicle in violation of section 321.178, 4 subsection 2 , paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (2), section 5 321.180B, subsection 6 , section 321.194, subsection 5 , 6 paragraph âdâ , section 321.256 , 321.257 , section 321.275, 7 subsection 4 , section 321.276 , 321.288, 321.297 , 321.298 , 8 321.299 , 321.302 , 321.303 , 321.304 , 321.305 , 321.306 , 9 321.307 , 321.311 , 321.319 , 321.320 , 321.321 , 321.322 , 321.323 , 10 321.324 , 321.324A , 321.327 , 321.329 , 321.333 , section 321.372, 11 subsection 3 , or section 321.449B , causing serious injury to 12 or the death of another person may be subject to the following 13 penalties in addition to the penalty provided for a scheduled 14 violation in section 805.8A or any other penalty provided by 15 law: 16